Illinois, session 104th, HB4630.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 9-8.5 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/9-8.5)7    Sec. 9-8.5. Limitations on campaign contributions.8    (a) It is unlawful for a political committee to accept 9contributions except as provided in this Section.10    (b) During an election cycle, a candidate political 11committee may not accept contributions with an aggregate value 12over the following: (i) $5,000 from any individual, (ii) 13$10,000 from any corporation, labor organization, or 14association, or (iii) $50,000 from a candidate political 15committee or political action committee. A candidate political 16committee may accept contributions in any amount from a 17political party committee. A candidate political committee 18established to elect a candidate to the General Assembly may 19accept contributions from only one legislative caucus 20committee. A candidate political committee may not accept 21contributions from a ballot initiative committee or from an 22independent expenditure committee.23    (b-5) Judicial elections.  HB4630- 2 -LRB104 16252 SPS 29636 b1        (1) In addition to any other provision of this 2    Section, a candidate political committee established to 3    support or oppose a candidate seeking nomination to the 4    Supreme Court, Appellate Court, or Circuit Court may not:5            (A) accept contributions from any entity that does 6        not disclose the identity of those who make 7        contributions to the entity, except for contributions 8        that are not required to be itemized by this Code; or9            (B) accept contributions from any out-of-state 10        person, as defined in this Article.11        (1.1) In addition to any other provision of this 12    Section, a political committee that is self-funding, as 13    described in subsection (h) of this Section, and is 14    established to support or oppose a candidate seeking 15    nomination, election, or retention to the Supreme Court, 16    the Appellate Court, or the Circuit Court may not accept 17    contributions from any single person, other than the 18    judicial candidate or the candidate's immediate family, in 19    a cumulative amount that exceeds $500,000 in any election 20    cycle. Any contribution in excess of the limits in this 21    paragraph (1.1) shall escheat to the State of Illinois. 22    Any political committee that receives such a contribution 23    shall immediately forward the amount that exceeds $500,000 24    to the State Treasurer who shall deposit the funds into 25    the State Treasury. 26        (1.2) In addition to any other provision of this   HB4630- 3 -LRB104 16252 SPS 29636 b1    Section, an independent expenditure committee established 2    to support or oppose a candidate seeking nomination, 3    election, or retention to the Supreme Court, the Appellate 4    Court, or the Circuit Court may not accept contributions 5    from any single person in a cumulative amount that exceeds 6    $500,000 in any election cycle. Any contribution in excess 7    of the limits in this paragraph (1.2) shall escheat to the 8    State of Illinois. Any independent expenditure committee 9    that receives such a contribution shall immediately 10    forward the amount that exceeds $500,000 to the State 11    Treasurer who shall deposit the funds into the State 12    Treasury. 13        (1.3) In addition to any other provision of this 14    Section, if a political committee established to support 15    or oppose a candidate seeking nomination, election, or 16    retention to the Supreme Court, the Appellate Court, or 17    the Circuit Court receives a contribution in excess of 18    $500 from: (i) any committee that is not required to 19    disclose its contributors under this Act; (ii) any 20    association that is not required to disclose its 21    contributors under this Act; or (iii) any other 22    organization or group of persons that is not required to 23    disclose its contributors under this Act, then that 24    contribution shall be considered an anonymous contribution 25    that shall escheat to the State, unless the political 26    committee reports to the State Board of Elections all   HB4630- 4 -LRB104 16252 SPS 29636 b1    persons who have contributed in excess of $500 during the 2    same election cycle to the committee, association, 3    organization, or group making the contribution. Any 4    political committee that receives such a contribution and 5    fails to report this information shall forward the 6    contribution amount immediately to the State Treasurer who 7    shall deposit the funds into the State Treasury. 8        (2) As used in this subsection, "contribution" has the 9    meaning provided in Section 9-1.4 and also includes the 10    following that are subject to the limits of this Section:11            (A) expenditures made by any person in concert or 12        cooperation with, or at the request or suggestion of, 13        a candidate, his or her designated committee, or their 14        agents; and15            (B) the financing by any person of the 16        dissemination, distribution, or republication, in 17        whole or in part, of any broadcast or any written, 18        graphic, or other form of campaign materials prepared 19        by the candidate, his or her campaign committee, or 20        their designated agents.21        (3) As to contributions to a candidate political 22    committee established to support a candidate seeking 23    nomination to the Supreme Court, Appellate Court, or 24    Circuit Court:25            (A) No person shall make a contribution in the 26        name of another person or knowingly permit his or her   HB4630- 5 -LRB104 16252 SPS 29636 b1        name to be used to effect such a contribution.2            (B) No person shall knowingly accept a 3        contribution made by one person in the name of another 4        person.5            (C) No person shall knowingly accept reimbursement 6        from another person for a contribution made in his or 7        her own name.8            (D) No person shall make an anonymous 9        contribution.10            (E) No person shall knowingly accept any anonymous 11        contribution.12            (F) No person shall predicate (1) any benefit, 13        including, but not limited to, employment decisions, 14        including hiring, promotions, bonus compensation, and 15        transfers, or (2) any other gift, transfer, or 16        emolument upon:17                (i) the decision by the recipient of that 18            benefit to donate or not to donate to a candidate; 19            or20                (ii) the amount of any such donation.21        (4) No judicial candidate or political committee 22    established to support a candidate seeking nomination to 23    the Supreme Court, Appellate Court, or Circuit Court shall 24    knowingly accept any contribution or make any expenditure 25    in violation of the provisions of this Section. No officer 26    or employee of a political committee established to   HB4630- 6 -LRB104 16252 SPS 29636 b1    support a candidate seeking nomination to the Supreme 2    Court, Appellate Court, or Circuit Court shall knowingly 3    accept a contribution made for the benefit or use of a 4    candidate or knowingly make any expenditure in support of 5    or opposition to a candidate or for electioneering 6    communications in relation to a candidate in violation of 7    any limitation designated for contributions and 8    expenditures under this Section.9        (5) Where the provisions of this subsection (b-5) 10    conflict with any other provision of this Code, this 11    subsection (b-5) shall control. 12    (c) During an election cycle, a political party committee 13may not accept contributions with an aggregate value over the 14following: (i) $10,000 from any individual, (ii) $20,000 from 15any corporation, labor organization, or association, or (iii) 16$50,000 from a political action committee. A political party 17committee may accept contributions in any amount from another 18political party committee or a candidate political committee, 19except as provided in subsection (c-5). Nothing in this 20Section shall limit the amounts that may be transferred 21between a political party committee established under 22subsection (a) of Section 7-8 of this Code and an affiliated 23federal political committee established under the Federal 24Election Code by the same political party. A political party 25committee may not accept contributions from a ballot 26initiative committee or from an independent expenditure   HB4630- 7 -LRB104 16252 SPS 29636 b1committee. A political party committee established by a 2legislative caucus may not accept contributions from another 3political party committee established by a legislative caucus.4    (c-5) (Blank). 5    (c-10) (Blank). 6    (d) During an election cycle, a political action committee 7may not accept contributions with an aggregate value over the 8following: (i) $10,000 from any individual, (ii) $20,000 from 9any corporation, labor organization, political party 10committee, or association, or (iii) $50,000 from a political 11action committee or candidate political committee. A political 12action committee may not accept contributions from a ballot 13initiative committee or from an independent expenditure 14committee.15    (e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (h-15), a A 16ballot initiative committee may accept contributions in any 17amount from any source, provided that the committee files the 18document required by Section 9-3 of this Article and files the 19disclosure reports required by the provisions of this Article.20    (e-5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (h-15), 21an An independent expenditure committee may accept 22contributions in any amount from any source, provided that the 23committee files the document required by Section 9-3 of this 24Article and files the disclosure reports required by the 25provisions of this Article.26    (e-10) A limited activity committee shall not accept   HB4630- 8 -LRB104 16252 SPS 29636 b1contributions, except that the officer or a candidate the 2committee has designated to support may contribute personal 3funds in order to pay for maintenance expenses. A limited 4activity committee may only make expenditures that are: (i) 5necessary for maintenance of the committee; (ii) for rent or 6lease payments until the end of the lease in effect at the time 7the officer or candidate is confirmed by the Senate; (iii) 8contributions to 501(c)(3) charities; or (iv) returning 9contributions to original contributors. 10    (f) Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a political 11committee from dividing the proceeds of joint fundraising 12efforts; provided that no political committee may receive more 13than the limit from any one contributor, and provided that an 14independent expenditure committee may not conduct joint 15fundraising efforts with a candidate political committee or a 16political party committee.17    (g) On January 1 of each odd-numbered year, the State 18Board of Elections shall adjust the amounts of the 19contribution limitations established in this Section for 20inflation as determined by the Consumer Price Index for All 21Urban Consumers as issued by the United States Department of 22Labor and rounded to the nearest $100. The State Board shall 23publish this information on its official website.24    (h) Self-funding candidates. If a public official, a 25candidate, or the public official's or candidate's immediate 26family contributes or loans to the public official's or   HB4630- 9 -LRB104 16252 SPS 29636 b1candidate's political committee or to other political 2committees that transfer funds to the public official's or 3candidate's political committee or makes independent 4expenditures for the benefit of the public official's or 5candidate's campaign during the 12 months prior to an election 6in an aggregate amount of more than (i) $250,000 for statewide 7office or (ii) $100,000 for all other elective offices, then 8the public official or candidate shall file with the State 9Board of Elections, within one day, a Notification of 10Self-funding that shall detail each contribution or loan made 11by the public official, the candidate, or the public 12official's or candidate's immediate family. Within 2 business 13days after the filing of a Notification of Self-funding, the 14notification shall be posted on the Board's website and the 15Board shall give official notice of the filing to each 16candidate for the same office as the public official or 17candidate making the filing, including the public official or 18candidate filing the Notification of Self-funding. Notice 19shall be sent via first class mail to the candidate and the 20treasurer of the candidate's committee. Notice shall also be 21sent by e-mail to the candidate and the treasurer of the 22candidate's committee if the candidate and the treasurer, as 23applicable, have provided the Board with an e-mail address. 24Upon posting of the notice on the Board's website, all 25candidates for that office, including the public official or 26candidate who filed a Notification of Self-funding, shall be   HB4630- 10 -LRB104 16252 SPS 29636 b1permitted to accept contributions in excess of any 2contribution limits imposed by subsection (b). If a public 3official or candidate filed a Notification of Self-funding 4during an election cycle that includes a general primary 5election or consolidated primary election and that public 6official or candidate is nominated, all candidates for that 7office, including the nominee who filed the notification of 8self-funding, shall be permitted to accept contributions in 9excess of any contribution limit imposed by subsection (b) for 10the subsequent election cycle. For the purposes of this 11subsection, "immediate family" means the spouse, parent, or 12child of a public official or candidate.13    (h-5) If a natural person or independent expenditure 14committee makes independent expenditures in support of or in 15opposition to the campaign of a particular public official or 16candidate in an aggregate amount of more than (i) $250,000 for 17statewide office or (ii) $100,000 for all other elective 18offices in an election cycle, as reported in a written 19disclosure filed under subsection (a) of Section 9-8.6 or 20subsection (e-5) of Section 9-10, then the State Board of 21Elections shall, within 2 business days after the filing of 22the disclosure, post the disclosure on the Board's website and 23give official notice of the disclosure to each candidate for 24the same office as the public official or candidate for whose 25benefit or detriment the natural person or independent 26expenditure committee made independent expenditures. Upon   HB4630- 11 -LRB104 16252 SPS 29636 b1posting of the notice on the Board's website, all candidates 2for that office in that election, including the public 3official or candidate for whose benefit or detriment the 4natural person or independent expenditure committee made 5independent expenditures, shall be permitted to accept 6contributions in excess of any contribution limits imposed by 7subsection (b). 8    (h-10) If the State Board of Elections receives 9notification or determines that a natural person or persons, 10an independent expenditure committee or committees, or 11combination thereof has made independent expenditures in 12support of or in opposition to the campaign of a particular 13public official or candidate in an aggregate amount of more 14than (i) $250,000 for statewide office or (ii) $100,000 for 15all other elective offices in an election cycle, then the 16Board shall, within 2 business days after discovering the 17independent expenditures that, in the aggregate, exceed the 18threshold set forth in (i) and (ii) of this subsection, post 19notice of this fact on the Board's website and give official 20notice to each candidate for the same office as the public 21official or candidate for whose benefit or detriment the 22independent expenditures were made. Notice shall be sent via 23first class mail to the candidate and the treasurer of the 24candidate's committee. Notice shall also be sent by e-mail to 25the candidate and the treasurer of the candidate's committee 26if the candidate and the treasurer, as applicable, have   HB4630- 12 -LRB104 16252 SPS 29636 b1provided the Board with an e-mail address. Upon posting of the 2notice on the Board's website, all candidates of that office 3in that election, including the public official or candidate 4for whose benefit or detriment the independent expenditures 5were made, may accept contributions in excess of any 6contribution limits imposed by subsection (b). 7    (h-15) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a 8foreign national may not make, directly or indirectly, a 9contribution to a ballot initiative committee or an 10independent expenditure committee for the purpose of 11influencing any question of public policy to be submitted to 12the voters, and neither a ballot initiative committee nor an 13independent expenditure committee may knowingly solicit or 14accept a contribution from a foreign national for the purpose 15of influencing any question of public policy to be submitted 16to the voters. Additionally, a foreign national may not make 17an independent expenditure for the purpose of influencing any 18question of public policy to be submitted to the voters. As 19used in this subsection, "foreign national" means a foreign 20national as defined in 52 U.S.C. 30121(b) and an entity with 21respect to which a foreign national holds, owns, controls, or 22otherwise has direct or indirect beneficial ownership of 50% 23or more of the total equity, outstanding voting shares, 24membership units, or other applicable ownership interests. 25    (i) For the purposes of this Section, a corporation, labor 26organization, association, or a political action committee   HB4630- 13 -LRB104 16252 SPS 29636 b1established by a corporation, labor organization, or 2association may act as a conduit in facilitating the delivery 3to a political action committee of contributions made through 4dues, levies, or similar assessments and the political action 5committee may report the contributions in the aggregate, 6provided that: (i) contributions made through dues, levies, or 7similar assessments paid by any natural person, corporation, 8labor organization, or association in a calendar year may not 9exceed the limits set forth in this Section; (ii) the 10corporation, labor organization, association, or a political 11action committee established by a corporation, labor 12organization, or association facilitating the delivery of 13contributions maintains a list of natural persons, 14corporations, labor organizations, and associations that paid 15the dues, levies, or similar assessments from which the 16contributions comprising the aggregate amount derive; and 17(iii) contributions made through dues, levies, or similar 18assessments paid by any natural person, corporation, labor 19organization, or association that exceed $1,000 in a quarterly 20reporting period shall be itemized on the committee's 21quarterly report and may not be reported in the aggregate. A 22political action committee facilitating the delivery of 23contributions or receiving contributions shall disclose the 24amount of contributions made through dues delivered or 25received and the name of the corporation, labor organization, 26association, or political action committee delivering the   HB4630- 14 -LRB104 16252 SPS 29636 b1contributions, if applicable. On January 1 of each 2odd-numbered year, the State Board of Elections shall adjust 3the amounts of the contribution limitations established in 4this subsection for inflation as determined by the Consumer 5Price Index for All Urban Consumers as issued by the United 6States Department of Labor and rounded to the nearest $100. 7The State Board shall publish this information on its official 8website.9    (j) A political committee that receives a contribution or 10transfer in violation of this Section shall dispose of the 11contribution or transfer by returning the contribution or 12transfer, or an amount equal to the contribution or transfer, 13to the contributor or transferor or donating the contribution 14or transfer, or an amount equal to the contribution or 15transfer, to a charity. A contribution or transfer received in 16violation of this Section that is not disposed of as provided 17in this subsection within 30 days after the Board sends 18notification to the political committee of the excess 19contribution by certified mail shall escheat to the General 20Revenue Fund and the political committee shall be deemed in 21violation of this Section and subject to a civil penalty not to 22exceed 150% of the total amount of the contribution. 23    (k) For the purposes of this Section, "statewide office" 24means the Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Attorney General, 25Secretary of State, Comptroller, and Treasurer. 26    (l) This Section is repealed if and when the United States   HB4630- 15 -LRB104 16252 SPS 29636 b1Supreme Court invalidates contribution limits on committees 2formed to assist candidates, political parties, corporations, 3associations, or labor organizations established by or 4pursuant to federal law. 5(Source: P.A. 102-664, eff. 1-1-22; 102-668, eff. 11-15-21; 6102-909, eff. 5-27-22; 103-600, eff. 7-1-24.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.